Hawaii statutes.
§157-18 Report to governor. At the end
of each license year, the board of agriculture shall submit to the governor a
report relating to the activities of the milk control program. [L 1967, c 260,
§11; HRS §157-18; am L 1986, c 61, §2]

Cross References

Annual reports, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next